Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.476

Use of shared leave—Impact on calculation of service credit and final average salary.

(1) A member in receipt of employer-authorized shared leave after June 10, 2010, shall receive the same treatment in respect to service credit and final average salary that the member would normally receive if using accrued annual leave or sick leave.

(2) For purposes of this section shared leave includes, but is not limited to:

(a) Direct transfers of annual leave, sick leave, or other leave from one employee to another;

(b) Indirect transfers of annual leave, sick leave, or other leave via leave banks or a similar pool of donated leave; or

(c) Shift trades or employees working shifts on behalf of a member.

(3) Shared leave that has been reported to the department prior to June 10, 2010, and for which contributions have been made, remains creditable for service credit and final average salary.

[ 2010 c 50 s 1. Formerly RCW 41.26.033.]